Oklahoma, session 2025, SB946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 665 Page 1


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-2-403, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-2-403. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, if a


child is charged with a delinquent act as a result of an offense


which would be a felony if committed by an adult, the court on its


own motion or at the request of the district attorney shall conduct


a preliminary hearing to determine whether or not there is


prosecutive merit to the complaint. If the court finds that


prosecutive merit exists, it shall continue the hearing for a


sufficient period of time to conduct an investigation and further


hearing to determine if the child should be held accountable for


acts of the child as if the child were an adult if the child should


be found to have committed the alleged act or omission.


Consideration shall be given to:


1. The seriousness of the alleged offense to the community, and


whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent,


premeditated or willful manner;


2. Whether the offense was against persons or property, greater


weight being given to transferring the accused person to the adult


criminal justice system for offenses against persons and, if


personal injury resulted, the degree of personal injury;


3. The sophistication and maturity of the juvenile and


capability of the juvenile of distinguishing right from wrong as


determined by consideration of a psychological evaluation of the

Req. No. 665 Page 2


juvenile, home, environmental situation, emotional attitude and


pattern of living;


4. The record and previous history of the accused person,


including previous contacts with community agencies, law enforcement


agencies, schools, juvenile or criminal courts and other


jurisdictions, prior periods of probation or prior commitments to


juvenile institutions;


5. The prospects for adequate protection of the public;


6. The likelihood of reasonable rehabilitation of the juvenile


if the juvenile is found to have committed the alleged offense, by


the use of procedures and facilities currently available to the


juvenile court; and


7. Whether the offense occurred while the juvenile was escaping


or in an escape status from an institution for delinquent children.


After the investigation and hearing, the court may in its


discretion proceed with the juvenile proceeding, or it shall state


its reasons in writing and shall certify, based on clear and


convincing evidence, that the child shall be held accountable for


acts of the child as if the child were an adult and shall be held


for proper criminal proceedings for the specific offense charged, by


any other division of the court which would have trial jurisdiction


of the offense if committed by an adult. The juvenile proceeding


shall not be dismissed until the criminal proceeding has commenced


and if no criminal proceeding commences within thirty (30) days of

Req. No. 665 Page 3


the date of the certification, unless stayed pending appeal, the


court shall proceed with the juvenile proceeding and the


certification shall lapse.


If not included in the original summons, notice of a hearing to


consider whether a child should be certified for trial as an adult


shall be given to all persons who are required to be served with a


summons at the commencement of a juvenile proceeding, but


publication in a newspaper when the address of a person is unknown


is not required. The purpose of the hearing shall be clearly stated


in the notice.


B. Prior to the entry of any order of certification, any child


in custody shall have the same right to be released upon bail as


would an adult under the same circumstances. Subsequent to the


entry of an order that a child stand trial as an adult, the child


shall have all the statutory and constitutional rights and


protections of an adult accused of a crime. Upon conviction, the


juvenile may be incarcerated in an adult jail, adult lockup, adult


detention facility or other adult facility if that facility is


licensed by the State Department of Health to detain children under


eighteen (18) years of age in compliance with Sections 2-3-101 and


2-3-103 of this title and Section 192 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes while the person is awaiting housing by the Department of


Corrections. Any city or county jail facility, subject to the


provisions of Section 192 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

Req. No. 665 Page 4


shall notify the State Department of Health within twenty-four (24)


hours of holding or detaining a person pursuant to this section.


If, prior to the entry of any order of certification, the child


becomes eighteen (18) years of age, the child may be detained in a


county jail or released on bail. If a child is certified to stand


trial as an adult, the court shall make every effort to avoid


duplication of the adult preliminary hearing and the prosecutorial


hearing in the juvenile certification process. The parties may


jointly stipulate to the court that the record for the prosecutorial


merit hearing in the juvenile proceeding be used for all or part of


the preliminary hearing.


C. Any child who has been certified to stand trial as an adult


pursuant to any order entered by any competent court of this state


or any other state shall be tried as an adult in all subsequent


criminal prosecutions, and shall not be subject to the jurisdiction


of the juvenile court or be eligible to be tried as a youthful


offender in any further proceedings.


D. An order either certifying a person as a child or an adult


pursuant to subsection A of this section or denying such


certification shall be a final order, appealable when entered and


shall not be modified.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-3-101, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 665 Page 5


Section 2-3-101. A. When a child is taken into custody


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Juvenile Code, the child


shall be detained only if it is necessary to assure the appearance


of the child in court or for the protection of the child or the


public.


1. a. No child twelve (12) years of age or younger shall be


placed in a juvenile detention facility unless all


alternatives have been exhausted and the child is


currently charged with a criminal offense that would


constitute a felony if committed by an adult and it


has been indicated by a risk-assessment screening that


the child requires detention. The detention of any


child twelve (12) years of age or younger shall be


judicially reviewed pursuant to subparagraph c of this


paragraph.


b. Any child who is thirteen (13) or fourteen (14) years


of age may be admitted to a juvenile detention


facility only after all alternatives have been


exhausted and the child is currently charged with a


criminal offense that would constitute a felony if


committed by an adult and it has been indicated by a


risk-assessment screening that the child requires


detention.



Req. No. 665 Page 6


c. No preadjudicatory or predisposition detention or


custody order shall remain in force and effect for


more than thirty (30) days. The court, for good and


sufficient cause shown, may extend the effective


period of such an order for an additional period not


to exceed sixty (60) days. If the child is being


detained for the commission of a murder, the court


may, if it is in the best interests of justice, extend


the effective period of such an order an additional


sixty (60) days.


d. Whenever the court orders a child to be held in a


juvenile detention facility, an order for secure


detention shall remain in force and effect for not


more than fifteen (15) days after such order. Upon an


application of the district attorney and after a


hearing on such application, the court, for good and


sufficient cause shown, may extend the effective


period of such an order for an additional period not


to exceed fifteen (15) days after such hearing. The


total period of preadjudicatory or predisposition


shall not exceed the ninety-day limitation as


specified in subparagraph a of this paragraph. The


child shall be present at the hearing on the


application for extension unless, as authorized and

Req. No. 665 Page 7


approved by the court, the attorney for the child is


present at the hearing and the child is available to


participate in the hearing via telephone conference


communication. For the purpose of this paragraph,


“telephone conference communication” means use of a


telephone device that allows all parties, including


the child, to hear and be heard by the other parties


at the hearing. After the hearing, the court may


order continued detention in a juvenile detention


center, may order the child detained in an alternative


to secure detention or may order the release of the


child from detention.


2. No child alleged or adjudicated to be deprived or in need of


supervision or who is or appears to be a minor in need of treatment


as defined by the Inpatient Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Treatment of Minors Act, shall be confined in any jail, adult


lockup, or adult detention facility. No child shall be transported


or detained in association with criminal, vicious, or dissolute


persons.


3. Except as otherwise authorized by this section a child who


has been taken into custody as a deprived child, a child in need of


supervision, or who appears to be a minor in need of treatment, may


not be placed in any detention facility pending court proceedings,


but must be placed in shelter care or foster care or, with regard to

Req. No. 665 Page 8


a child who appears to be a minor in need of treatment, a behavioral


health treatment facility in accordance with the provisions of the


Inpatient Mental Health and Substance Abuse Treatment of Minors Act,


or released to the custody of the parents of the child or some other


responsible party. Provided, this shall not preclude runaway


juveniles from other states, with or without delinquent status, to


be held in a detention facility in accordance with the Interstate


Compact for Juveniles in Sections 2-9-101 through 2-9-116 of this


title and rules promulgated by the Interstate Commission.


B. No child shall be placed in secure detention unless:


1. The child is an escapee from any delinquent placement;


2. The child is a fugitive from another jurisdiction with a


warrant on a delinquency charge or confirmation of delinquency


charges by the home jurisdiction;


3. The child is seriously assaultive or destructive towards


others or self;


4. The child is currently charged with any criminal offense


that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult or a


misdemeanor and:


a. is on probation or parole on a prior delinquent


offense,


b. is on preadjudicatory community supervision, or


c. is currently on release status on a prior delinquent


offense;

Req. No. 665 Page 9


5. The child has willfully failed or there is reason to believe


that the child will willfully fail to appear for juvenile court


proceedings; or


6. A warrant for the child has been issued on the basis that:


a. the child is absent from court-ordered placement


without approval by the court,


b. the child is absent from designated placement by the


Office of Juvenile Affairs without approval by the


Office of Juvenile Affairs,


c. there is reason to believe the child will not remain


at said placement, or


d. the child is subject to an administrative transfer or


parole revocation proceeding.


C. A child who has violated a court order and has had the order


revoked or modified pursuant to Section 2-2-503 of this title may be


placed into an Office-of-Juvenile-Affairs-designated sanction


detention bed or an Office-of-Juvenile-Affairs-approved sanction


program.


D. Priority shall be given to the use of juvenile detention


facilities for the detention of juvenile offenders through


provisions requiring the removal from detention of a juvenile with a


lower priority status if an empty detention bed is not available at


the time of referral of a juvenile with a higher priority status and


if the juvenile with a higher priority status would be more of a

Req. No. 665 Page 10


danger to the public than the juvenile with the lower priority


status.


E. Juvenile detention facilities shall be the initial placement


for all persons under eighteen (18) years of age. No child shall be


placed in secure detention in an adult jail, adult lockup, adult


detention facility or other adult facility except as provided in


this section.


1. Any child who is at least fifteen (15) years of age who is


charged with murder in the first degree may be detained in an adult


jail, adult lockup, adult detention facility or other adult facility


only after a hearing in which the child is provided representation


and the court makes a written finding that it is in the interest of


justice that the child be placed in an adult jail, adult lockup,


adult detention facility or other adult facility.


2. In determining whether it is in the interest of justice that


a child who is at least fifteen (15) years of age and who is charged


with murder in the first degree be placed in an adult jail, adult


lockup, adult detention facility or other adult facility, the court


shall consider:


a. the age of the child,


b. the physical and mental maturity of the child,


c. the present mental state of the child, including


whether the child presents an imminent risk of harm to


the child,

Req. No. 665 Page 11


d. the nature and circumstances of the alleged offense,


e. the child’s history of prior delinquent acts,


f. the relative ability of the available adult and


juvenile detention facilities to not only meet the


specific needs of the child but also to protect the


safety of the public as well as other detained youth,


and


g. any other relevant factors.


3. If a court determines that it is in the interest of justice


that the child be placed in an adult jail, adult lockup, adult


detention facility or other adult facility:


a. the court shall hold a hearing not less frequently


than once every thirty (30) days, or in the case of a


rural jurisdiction, which is any jurisdiction not


located in a metropolitan statistical area as defined


by the United States Office of Management and Budget,


not less frequently than once every forty-five (45)


days, to review whether it is still in the interest of


justice to permit the juvenile to be so held or have


such sight and sound contact, and


b. the child shall not be held in any adult jail or


lockup for adults or be permitted to have sight or


sound contact with adult inmates for more than one


hundred eighty (180) days, unless the court, in

Req. No. 665 Page 12


writing, determines there is good cause for an


extension or the child expressly waives this


limitation.


F. When a child is placed in an adult jail, adult lockup, adult


detention facility or other adult facility, he or she shall be


afforded the following rights and protections in order to address


the child’s health and safety:


1. A copy of the child’s most current mental health or suicide


screening instrument approved by the Office of Juvenile Affairs


shall be provided to the adult jail, adult lockup or adult detention


facility at the time of the child’s transfer; and


2. Adult jails, adult lockups, adult detention facilities or


other adult facilities shall process requests for visits and allow


approved visitors contact visits with the child within five (5)


business days of the request.


G. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no child


shall be placed in secure detention in an adult jail, adult lockup,


adult detention facility or other adult facility unless:


a. the adult jail, adult lockup or adult detention


facility provides sight and sound separation for


juveniles, pursuant to standards required by


subsection E of Section 2-3-103 of this title, and


b. the adult jail, adult lockup or adult detention


facility meets the requirements for licensure of

Req. No. 665 Page 13


juvenile detention facilities, as adopted by the


Office of Juvenile Affairs, is appropriately licensed,


and provides sight and sound separation for juveniles,


which includes:


(1) total separation between juveniles and adult


facility spatial areas such that there could be


no haphazard or accidental contact between


juvenile and adult residents in the respective


facilities,


(2) total separation in all juvenile and adult


program activities within the facilities,


including recreation, education, counseling,


health care, dining, sleeping and general living


activities, and


(3) separate juvenile and adult staff, specifically


direct care staff such as recreation, education


and counseling.


Specialized services staff, such as cooks,


bookkeepers, and medical professionals who are not


normally in contact with detainees or whose infrequent


contacts occur under conditions of separation of


juveniles and adults can serve both.


2. Nothing in this section shall preclude a child who is


detained for the commission of a crime that would constitute a

Req. No. 665 Page 14


felony if committed by an adult, or a child who is an escapee from a


juvenile secure facility or from an Office of Juvenile Affairs group


home from being held in any jail certified by the State Department


of Health, police station or similar law enforcement offices for up


to six (6) hours for purposes of identification, processing or


arranging for transfer to a secure detention or alternative to


secure detention. Such holding shall be limited to the absolute


minimum time necessary to complete these actions.


a. The time limitations for holding a child in a jail for


the purposes of identification, processing or


arranging transfer established by this section shall


not include the actual travel time required for


transporting a child from a jail to a juvenile


detention facility or alternative to secure detention.


b. Whenever the time limitations established by this


subsection are exceeded, this circumstance shall not


constitute a defense in a subsequent delinquency or


criminal proceeding.


3. Nothing in this section shall preclude detaining in a county


jail or other adult detention facility an eighteen-year-old charged


in a juvenile petition for whom certification to stand trial as an


adult is prayed. However, if no certification motion is filed, the


eighteen-year-old may remain in a juvenile detention facility as


long as secure detention is required.

Req. No. 665 Page 15


4. Nothing in this section shall preclude detaining in a county


jail or other adult detention facility a person provided for in


Section 2-3-102 of this title if written or electronically


transmitted confirmation is received from the state seeking return


of the individual that the person is a person provided for in


Section 2-3-102 of this title and if, during the time of detention,


the person is detained in a facility meeting the requirements of


Section 2-3-103 of this title.


5. Nothing in this section shall preclude detaining a person,


whose age is not immediately ascertainable and who is being detained


for the commission of a felony, in a jail certified by the State


Department of Health, a police station or similar law enforcement


office for up to twenty-four (24) hours for the purpose of


determining whether or not the person is a child, if:


a. there is a reasonable belief that the person is


eighteen (18) years of age or older,


b. there is a reasonable belief that a felony has been


committed by the person,


c. a court order for such detention is obtained from a


judge of the district court within six (6) hours of


initially detaining the person,


d. there is no juvenile detention facility that has space


available for the person and that is within thirty


(30) miles of the jail, police station, or law

Req. No. 665 Page 16


enforcement office in which the person is to be


detained, and


e. during the time of detention the person is detained in


a facility meeting the requirements of subparagraph b


of paragraph 1 of this subsection.


The time limitation provided for in this paragraph shall include the


time the person is detained prior to the issuance of the court


order.


The time limitation provided for in this paragraph shall not include


the actual travel time required for transporting the person to the


jail, police station, or similar law enforcement office. If the


time limitation established by this paragraph is exceeded, this


circumstance shall not constitute a defense in any subsequent


delinquency or criminal proceeding.


H. Nothing contained in this section shall in any way reduce or


eliminate the liability of a county as otherwise provided by law for


injury or damages resulting from the placement of a child in an


adult jail, adult lockup, adult detention facility or other adult


facility.


I. Any juvenile detention facility shall be available for use


by any eligible Indian child as that term is defined by the Oklahoma


Indian Child Welfare Act, providing that the use of the juvenile


detention facility meets the requirements of the Oklahoma Juvenile



Req. No. 665 Page 17


Code. The Indian tribe may contract with any juvenile detention


facility for the providing of detention services.


J. Each member of the staff of a juvenile detention facility


shall satisfactorily complete a training program provided or


approved by the Office of Juvenile Affairs.


K. Whenever a juvenile is placed in any adult jail, adult


lockup, adult detention facility or other adult facility, the Office


of Juvenile Affairs shall have access to all facilities which detain


such juveniles and shall have access to any data regarding such


juveniles. The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall have access to all


adult jails, adult lockups, adult detention facilities or other


adult facilities in this state, including all data maintained by


such facilities, to assure compliance with this section. The Board


of Juvenile Affairs shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement


the provisions of this section.


L. Any city or county jail facility, subject to the provisions


of Section 192 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall notify


the State Department of Health within twenty-four (24) hours of


holding or detaining a person pursuant to this section.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-3-103, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 242, O.S.L. 2022 (10A O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2-3-103), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-3-103. A. Provision shall be made for the temporary


detention of children in a juvenile detention facility or the court

Req. No. 665 Page 18


may arrange for the care and custody of such children temporarily in


private homes, subject to the supervision of the court, or the court


may provide shelter or may enter into a contract with any


institution or agency to receive, for temporary care and custody,


children within the jurisdiction of the court. The Office of


Juvenile Affairs shall not be ordered to provide detention unless


said Office has designated and is operating detention services or


facilities.


B. County sheriffs of the arresting agency, their designee, any


peace officer, private contractors under contract with the Office of


Juvenile Affairs for transportation services, or juvenile court


officers shall provide for the transportation of juveniles to and


from secure detention for purposes of admission, interfacility


transfer, discharge, medical or dental attention, court appearance,


or placement designated by the Office. No private contract for


transportation services shall be entered into by the Office unless


the private contractor demonstrates to the satisfaction of the


Office that such contractor is able to obtain insurance or provide


self-insurance to indemnify the Office against possible lawsuits and


meets the requirements of subparagraphs a, b and d of paragraph 4 of


subsection C of this section. The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall


not be ordered to provide transportation for a juvenile who is


detained in or is destined for secure detention. The Office of


Juvenile Affairs shall provide reimbursement to the entity

Req. No. 665 Page 19


transporting juveniles for necessary and actual expenses for


transporting juveniles who are detained in or destined for a secure


detention center as follows:


1. A fee for the cost of personal services at the rate of


Seventeen Dollars ($17.00) per hour;


2. Mileage reimbursement for each mile actually traveled at the


rate established in the State Travel Reimbursement Act;


3. Meals for transporting personnel, not to exceed Ten Dollars


($10.00) per meal; and


4. Meals for juveniles being transported, not to exceed Ten


Dollars ($10.00) per meal.


The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall process and mail


reimbursement claims within sixty (60) days of receipt. Payments


for services provided by a county sheriff’s office shall be paid to


the county and deposited in the service fee account of the sheriff.


C. 1. All juvenile detention facilities shall be certified by


the Office of Juvenile Affairs. To be certified, a juvenile


detention facility shall be required to meet standards for


certification promulgated by the Board of Juvenile Affairs.


2. The board of county commissioners of every county shall


provide for the temporary detention of a child who is or who may be


subject to secure detention and may construct a building or rent


space for such purpose. The boards of county commissioners shall


provide for temporary detention services and facilities in

Req. No. 665 Page 20


accordance with the provisions of the State Plan for the


Establishment of Juvenile Detention Services adopted pursuant to


subsection D of this section and in accordance with subsections A


and C of Section 2-7-608 of this title. The boards of county


commissioners are hereby authorized to create multicounty trust


authorities for the purpose of operating juvenile detention


facilities.


3. In order to operate the juvenile detention facilities


designated in the State Plan for the Establishment of Juvenile


Detention Services and in subsections A and C of Section 2-7-608 of


this title, the boards of county commissioners in the designated


host counties shall:


a. operate the juvenile detention facility through a


statutorily constituted juvenile bureau subject to the


supervision of the district court, or


b. operate the juvenile detention facility by employing a


manager who may employ personnel and incur other


expenses as may be necessary for its operation and


maintenance, or


c. contract with a public agency, private agency,


federally recognized tribe, or single or multi-county


trust authority for the operation of the juvenile


detention facility. In the event any board of county


commissioners contracts with a public or private

Req. No. 665 Page 21


agency or a federally recognized tribe, pursuant to


the provisions of this section, the Office is


authorized to directly contract with and pay such


public or private agency or federally recognized tribe


for provision of detention services. Any contract


with a federally recognized tribe shall become


effective upon approval by the board of county


commissioners.


4. Management contracts for privately operated detention


facilities shall be negotiated with the firm found most qualified by


the board of county commissioners. However, no private management


contract shall be entered into by the board unless the private


contractor demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board:


a. that the contractor has the qualifications,


experience, and personnel necessary to implement the


terms of the contract,


b. that the financial condition of the contractor is such


that the term of the contract can be fulfilled,


c. that the ability of the contractor to obtain insurance


or provide self-insurance to indemnify the county


against possible lawsuits and to compensate the county


for any property damage or expenses incurred due to


the private operation of the juvenile detention


facility, and

Req. No. 665 Page 22


d. that the contractor has the ability to comply with


applicable court orders and rules of the Office of


Juvenile Affairs.


5. All counties to be served by a secure juvenile detention


facility may, upon the opening of such facility, contract with the


operators for the use of the facility for the temporary detention of


children who are subject to secure detention; provided, however, a


jail, adult lockup, or other adult detention facility may be used


for the secure detention of a child as provided for in Section 2-3-


101 of this title.


6. Expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this


section shall be paid from the general fund of the county or from


other public funds lawfully appropriated for such purposes or from


private funds that are available for such purposes. A county may


also issue bonds for the construction of detention facilities.


7. The operation of a juvenile detention facility by a county


shall constitute a quasi-judicial function and is also hereby


declared to be a function of the State of Oklahoma for purposes of


the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution. In


addition, no contract authorized by the provisions of this section


for the providing of transportation services or for the operation of


a juvenile detention facility shall be awarded until the contractor


demonstrates to the satisfaction of the county that the contractor


has obtained liability insurance with the limits specified by The

Req. No. 665 Page 23


Governmental Tort Claims Act against lawsuits arising from the


operation of the juvenile detention facility by the contractor, or


if the contract is for the providing of transportation services, the


contractor has obtained liability insurance with the limits


specified by The Governmental Tort Claims Act against lawsuits


arising from the transportation of juveniles as authorized by


subsection A of this section.


D. The Board of Juvenile Affairs, from monies appropriated for


that purpose, shall develop, adopt, and implement a plan for secure


juvenile detention services and alternatives to secure detention, to


be known as the State Plan for the Establishment of Juvenile


Detention Services, which shall provide for the establishment of


juvenile detention facilities and services with due regard for


appropriate geographical distribution and existing juvenile


detention programs operated by statutorily constituted juvenile


bureaus. Said plan may be amended or modified by the Board as


necessary and appropriate. Until said plan is adopted by the Board,


the plan adopted by the Commission for Human Services shall remain


in effect.


1. The Board of Juvenile Affairs shall establish procedures for


the letting of contracts or grants, including grants to existing


juvenile detention programs operated by statutorily constituted


juvenile bureaus, and the conditions and requirements for the


receipt of said grants or contracts for juvenile detention services

Req. No. 665 Page 24


and facilities as provided in this section and Section 2-7-401 of


this title. A copy of such procedures shall be made available to


any member of the general public upon request. All such grants or


contracts shall require the participation of local resources in the


funding of juvenile detention facilities. A contract for services


shall be based upon a formula approved by the Board which shall set


the contract amount in accordance with the services offered and the


degree of compliance with standards for certification.


2. The Board of Juvenile Affairs shall establish standards for


the certification of detention services and juvenile detention


facilities. Such standards may include, but not be limited to:


screening for detention; education and recreation opportunities for


juveniles in secure detention; and accreditation by the American


Correctional Association. As a condition of continuing eligibility


for grants or contracts, secure juvenile detention services and


facilities shall be certified by the Board within two (2) years of


the date of the initial grant or contract.


E. The State Department of Health, with the assistance of the


Office of Juvenile Affairs, shall establish standards for the


certification of jails, adult lockups, and adult detention


facilities used to detain juveniles. Such standards shall include


but not be limited to: separation of juveniles from adults;


supervision of juveniles; and health and safety measures for


juveniles. The Department of Health is authorized to inspect any

Req. No. 665 Page 25


jail, adult lockup, or adult detention facility for the purpose of


determining compliance with such standards. No jail, adult lockup,


or other adult detention facility shall be used to detain juveniles


unless such jail, adult lockup, or other adult detention facility


complies with the standards established by the Department of Health


and is designated as a place for the detention of juveniles by the


judge having juvenile docket responsibility in the county from a


list of eligible facilities supplied by the Department of Health.


The development and approval of the standards provided for in


this paragraph shall comply with the provisions of the


Administrative Procedures Act.


F. The State Board Department of Health shall promulgate rules


providing for the routine recording and reporting of the use of any


adult jail, lockup or other adult facility for the detention of any


person under the age of eighteen (18).


1. For the purpose of ensuring the uniformity and compatibility


of information related to the detention of persons under age


eighteen (18), said rules shall be reviewed and approved by the


Oklahoma Commission on Children and Youth prior to their adoption by


the Board; and Department.


2. Records of detention shall be provided to the State


Department of Health pursuant to the statutory sections authorizing


holding or detention and established standards and shall be reviewed


during each routine inspection of adult jails, lockups or other

Req. No. 665 Page 26


adult detention facilities inspected by the State Department of


Health and a statistical report of said detentions shall be


submitted to the Office of Juvenile Affairs at least every six (6)


months in a form approved by the Board of Juvenile Affairs.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-5-204, as


amended by Section 4, Chapter 375, O.S.L. 2022 (10A O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2-5-204), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-5-204. A. A child who is arrested for an offense


pursuant to subsection A, B, C, D, or E of Section 2-5-205 of this


title, may, depending on the child’s age and alleged crime, be


charged as a juvenile delinquent, youthful offender, or an adult.


If charged as a juvenile delinquent, a petition shall be filed. If


charged as a youthful offender or adult, an information shall be


filed. At any time after the child is charged as a youthful


offender or adult, the district attorney may dismiss the information


and file a juvenile delinquent petition.


B. If the child is not otherwise represented by counsel and


either the child, his or her parent, guardian, or next friend


requests an attorney prior to or during interrogation, or upon being


charged by information, as provided in subsection A of this section,


the court shall appoint an attorney, who shall not be a district


attorney, for the child regardless of any attempted waiver by the


parent, guardian, or next friend of the right to be represented by


counsel. If the court appoints an attorney for a child for the

Req. No. 665 Page 27


interrogation or at the initial appearance, the court shall review


the appointment at a subsequent hearing to determine if the child,


parent, guardian, or next friend qualifies for a court-appointed


attorney.


C. When a person proceeds to trial as either a youthful


offender or as an adult as provided by the Youthful Offender Act,


the accused person shall have all the statutory and constitutional


rights and protections of an adult accused of a crime. All


proceedings shall be as for a criminal action and the provisions of


Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall apply, except as provided


for in the Youthful Offender Act.


D. All youthful offender court records for a person who is


certified to stand trial as an adult or youthful offender shall be


considered adult records and shall not be subject to the provisions


of Chapter 6 of the Oklahoma Juvenile Code; provided, however, all


reports, evaluations, motions, records, exhibits or documents


regarding the educational history, mental health or medical


treatment or condition of the person that are submitted to the court


or admitted into evidence during the hearing on the motion for


certification as a juvenile or a youthful offender or on the motion


for imposition of an adult sentence shall be confidential and shall


be filed or admitted under seal, except that such records shall be


provided to the Office of Juvenile Affairs. Any testimony regarding


the reports, evaluations, motions, records, exhibits or documents

Req. No. 665 Page 28


shall be given in camera and shall not be open to the general


public; provided, all persons having a direct interest in the case


as provided in paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 2-2-402 of


this title shall be allowed to be present during the testimony but


shall be admonished not to discuss the testimony following the


hearing. All reports, evaluations, motions, records, exhibits or


documents shall be released from under seal by order of the court if


the youthful offender is sentenced to the custody or supervision of


the Department of Corrections by the court pursuant to paragraph 1


of subsection B of Section 2-5-209 or subsection B of Section 2-5-


210 of this title or if the juvenile or youthful offender is later


charged as an adult with a felony crime.


E. Proceedings against a youthful offender shall be heard by


any judge of the district court.


F. Upon arrest and detention of a person subject to the


provisions of the Youthful Offender Act, the person has the same


right to be released on bail as would an adult in the same


circumstances.


G. Upon a verdict of guilty or entry of a plea of guilty or


nolo contendere by a youthful offender who has been certified for


the imposition of an adult sentence as provided by Section 2-5-207


of this title, the person may be detained in an adult jail, adult


lockup, adult detention facility or other adult facility if that


facility is licensed by the State Department of Health to detain

Req. No. 665 Page 29


children under eighteen (18) years of age in compliance with


Sections 2-3-101 and 2-3-103 of this title and Section 192 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes and all applicable standards while the


person is awaiting housing by the Department of Corrections. Any


city or county jail facility, subject to the provisions of Section


192 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall notify the State


Department of Health within twenty-four (24) hours of holding or


detaining a person pursuant to this subsection.


H. A child or youthful offender shall be tried as an adult in


all subsequent criminal prosecutions, and shall not be subject to


the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as a juvenile delinquent or


youthful offender processes in any further proceedings if:


1. The child or youthful offender has been certified to stand


trial as an adult pursuant to any certification procedure provided


by law and is subsequently convicted of the alleged offense or


against whom the imposition of judgment and sentence has been


deferred; or


2. The youthful offender has been certified for the imposition


of an adult sentence as provided by Section 2-5-207 of this title


and is subsequently convicted of the alleged offense or against whom


the imposition of judgment and sentencing has been deferred.


I. Except as otherwise provided in the Youthful Offender Act, a


person who has been certified as a youthful offender shall be


prosecuted as a youthful offender in all subsequent criminal

Req. No. 665 Page 30


proceedings until the youthful offender has attained eighteen (18)


years of age.


All proceedings for the commission of a crime committed after a


youthful offender has reached eighteen (18) years of age shall be


adult proceedings.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 192, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 35, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 192), is amended to read as follows:


Section 192. A. The State Department of Health shall inspect


at least once each year all city and county jails to ensure


compliance with the standards promulgated pursuant to the provisions


of this section. The standards shall provide provision for:


1. Uniform admission and release procedures;


2. Uniform, safe, and sensible security measures;


3. Proper, fit, and sanitary conditions;


4. Inmates to be fed a wholesome and adequate diet Food


services and dietary requirements;


5. Medical and mental health services;


6. Inmate supervision and management;


7. Staffing and training;


8. Emergency procedures and fire safety;


5. 9. Inmates to have adequate clothing and a usable bed. fixed


sleeping surface that is at least twelve (12) inches off the floor.


Portable platform beds may only be used on a temporary basis in lieu

Req. No. 665 Page 31


of a fixed sleeping surface, provided that inmates are medically


screened for such use;


10. Such facility City and county jail facilities shall have


showers with hot and cold running water, toilets, and water basins


provided in the ratio of not less than one to every twenty


prisoners. Counties may build barrack-style jails, single or double


cell, to meet the security needs of the county for minimum security


prisoners. These jails shall meet all the minimum requirements set


forth in this section or any other provision of law. Except as


otherwise provided in this section, all facilities under this


section shall have showers with hot and cold running water, toilets


and water basins provided in the ratio of not less than one to every


twenty prisoners.;


11. Counties may also build tent jails, which shall be


temporary in nature, to meet the security needs of the county for


minimum security prisoners. The temporary tent jails shall not be


required to meet the minimum requirements set forth in this section


or any other provision of law. The State Board of Health Department


shall promulgate minimum standards for temporary tent jails, which


standards shall be designed to specifically address and take into


consideration the temporary status of the inmate housing needs of


the county. As used in this paragraph, “barrack-style” means a


single designated space within a city or county jail facility for


the purpose of housing three or more inmates;

Req. No. 665 Page 32


6. 12. Inmates to be properly advised of rules of the facility


in which they are detained;


7. 13. Staff members to receive training in order to assist


them in performing their assigned tasks, such training to be


provided through a program approved by the State Department of


Health. All employees who work in direct have contact with inmates


after the first year of employment shall receive, at a minimum, of


four (4) hours’ hours of review of and training per year on material


as required by the State Department of Health and at a maximum,.


Such review and training requirement shall not exceed eight (8)


hours of detention officer training per year after the first year of


employment;


8. Proper 14. Classification and segregation to include proper


steps to be taken to ensure the safety and segregation of women, and


the infirm, and minors;


9. 15. Adequate medical care, provided such medical care shall


be limited to illnesses or injuries incurred during the time


beginning with the arrest and throughout the time of incarceration.


This shall not prevent an inmate from applying for assistance and


receiving assistance, provided the inmate meets or exceeds


established requirements;


10. 16. No person to be confined without twenty-four-hour


supervision; and



Req. No. 665 Page 33


11. At least one 17. No person under the age of eighteen (18)


years of age, except as provided in subsections E, F, and G of


Section 2-3-101 of this title, shall be held in any city or county


jail facility for more than six (6) hours. Any such holding of a


person under eighteen (18) years of age shall be done with complete


sight and sound separation from inmates eighteen (18) years of age


and older; and


18. There shall be designated exit and marked emergency


evacuation exits in the each city and county jail facility that will


comply with the requirements of the State Fire Marshal. The marked


emergency evacuation exits must permit prompt evacuation of inmates


and staff in an emergency. A city or county jail facility in


existence on or before November 1, 1985, shall not be required to


construct additional exits if it has one exit which is deemed


adequate by the State Fire Marshal.


B. In the event such an inspection shall reveal reveals to the


State Department of Health the commission of a crime or crimes


incidental to the operations of a city or county jail facility, it


shall be the duty of the Department to initiate a complaint with the


appropriate district attorney, and to cooperate in the prosecution


of the alleged offender in the event an information is filed


pursuant to such complaint.


B. C. Any county, city, or town may operate a holding facility


for the incarceration of persons under arrest who are to be charged

Req. No. 665 Page 34


with a crime, which holding facility shall not be required to meet


the standards established in this section for jails, as long as no


person is held therein for a period longer than twelve (12) hours


and as long as an employee of the county, city, or town is available


to render aid to or to release any person so confined in the event


aid or release is required because of a health or life-endangering


emergency.


C. D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule, any


county or municipality that operates a jail facility which houses


forty or fewer prisoners at all times which:


1. Provides twenty-four-hour supervision of prisoner activity


that is conducted either by direct observation or electronically by


closed-circuit television video surveillance; and


2. Provides an intercommunication system that terminates in a


location that is staffed twenty-four (24) hours a day and is capable


of providing an emergency response,


shall not be required to have more than one detention officer or


dispatcher on-site to provide for the security, custody, and


supervision of prisoners. Staff shall be available to perform


sensitive functions and procedures as necessary and to accommodate


inmate gender, the infirm, or the holding of persons under eighteen


(18) years of age.





Req. No. 665 Page 35


D. E. Any county or municipality that operates a jail facility


which houses more than forty and less than seventy-five prisoners at


all times which:


1. Provides twenty-four-hour supervision of prisoner activity


that is conducted either by direct observation or electronically by


closed-circuit television video surveillance; and


2. Provides an intercommunication system that terminates in a


location that is staffed twenty-four (24) hours a day and is capable


of providing an emergency response,


shall be required to have more than one detention officer or one


detention officer and at least one other basic CLEET-certified


person on the same premises as the jail facility to provide for the


security, custody, and supervision of prisoners. Staff shall be


available to perform sensitive functions and procedures as necessary


and to accommodate inmate gender, the infirm, or the holding of


persons under eighteen (18) years of age.


Within ninety (90) days after June 9, 1994, the


F. The State Board Department of Health shall promulgate new


rules governing square footage requirements, double-celling of


prisoners and the ratio of showers, toilets, and water basins to


prisoners. The rules so promulgated shall be governed by the


guidelines enumerated in this section, and shall be designed to


carry out the intent and purpose of the guidelines. All cells and


living areas shall have at least thirty-five (35) square feet of

Req. No. 665 Page 36


unencumbered walking floor space for the initial inmate and at least


twenty (20) square feet of additional unencumbered floor space for


each additional inmate occupying the same cell or living area. In


determining unencumbered floor space, the total square footage is


measured and the square footage of all fixtures and equipment is


subtracted, resulting in the total amount of unencumbered floor


space in the cell. Jail capacity shall be determined during each


annual inspection by the Department by identifying and documenting


the number of fixed sleeping surfaces, cells, and living areas


within a facility. Each city or county jail facility in this state


shall be in compliance with the rules so promulgated on or before


January 1, 1995 January 1, 2027.


G. Any city or county jail that is constructed or substantially


remodeled shall be required to be in compliance with the


requirements and standards in effect at the time of construction or


remodeling. Plans for the construction of a new detention facility


or the substantial remodeling of an existing facility shall be


submitted to the Department for approval. For purposes of this


subsection, “substantially remodeled” means the cost to remodel or


repair is at least fifty percent (50%) of the cost to replace the


facility.


H. A county, municipality, or public trust which operates a


city or county jail facility may request a waiver, including for a


temporary emergency resulting from a man-made or natural disaster,

Req. No. 665 Page 37


from the standards promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this


section upon a showing that application of such provisions would


impose an undue hardship upon the county, municipality, or public


trust, or upon the inmates currently held at the facility. All


requests shall be filed with the Department and shall include


justification demonstrating the undue hardship. The waiver


application shall also include a plan for the housing and care of


city or county jail facility inmates for the duration of the waiver


and identification of the specific provisions requested to be


waived. The Department may grant the waiver in whole or in part and


may, as a condition of granting the waiver, require the county,


municipality, or public trust to submit a plan and timetable for


compliance with the standards. The Department shall promulgate


rules and establish procedures necessary to implement the waiver


process established pursuant to this section.


E. I. The State Department of Health shall employ inspectors


and other personnel as necessary and specifically authorized by the


Legislature in order to carry out the provisions of this section and


may rent or purchase premises or equipment in order to assist


inspectors in the performance of their functions.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 193, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 193. A. Inspectors employed by the State Department of


Health shall be permitted to enter all jail premises and

Req. No. 665 Page 38


administrative offices and be permitted access to all electronic


information, documents, videos, and detainees in the facility for


the purpose of performing their assigned duties.


B. Inspectors shall be permitted to enter all jail premises and


administrative offices with Department-issued equipment, including


cell phones, to assist inspectors in the performance of their


assigned duties.


C. The results of these inspections shall be presented in the


form of a written report to the person immediately responsible for


the administration of the facility inspected and such other offices


the Department deems appropriate. The report shall contain:


1. A list of deficiencies in the condition or operation of the


facility and specific proposals for their solution; and


2. A statement as to whether or not the facility inspected is


in substantial compliance with the jail standards established


pursuant to Section 192 of this title.


D. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of an inspection report


from the Department, a person responsible for the administration of


the facility shall submit a written response to the Department that


includes the facility’s plan to address the cited deficiencies in


the inspection report.


E. A complaint regarding a city or county jail and subsequent


Department investigation shall not be made public unless the


Department substantiates the violations alleged in the complaint.

Req. No. 665 Page 39


F. The Department shall redact all personal, identifiable


information of inmates in a city or county jail facility when


producing documentation pursuant to the Oklahoma Open Records Act.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 194, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 194. A. If the deficiencies listed in the written


inspection report have not been corrected, within sixty (60) days


after delivery of the written inspection report or submission of the


written response to the Department from the person responsible for


the administration of the facility pursuant to subsection D of


Section 193 of this title, the Commissioner of Health shall be


authorized to file a complaint with the Attorney General or the


district attorney for the purpose of assistance in obtaining


compliance or to close the deficient facility. Provided, that upon


demonstration of a good-faith effort by the governmental entity


involved county, municipality, or public trust that operates the


city or county jail facility to correct said such deficiencies and


achieve compliance with the established standards, the Commissioner


of Health shall extend the time for compliance a reasonable period


before filing the complaint requesting assistance in obtaining


compliance or the closing of the facility.


B. An action to close such facility shall be brought in the


district court having jurisdiction in the county in which the


facility is located. Upon the issuance of an order by the district

Req. No. 665 Page 40


court to close the facility, the facility shall be closed and


prisoners shall be removed to a suitable facility at the expense of


the governmental entity responsible for the facility ordered closed.


Provided, that upon demonstration of a good-faith effort by the


governmental entity involved county, municipality, or public trust


that operates the city or county jail facility to correct said such


deficiencies and achieve compliance with the established standards,


the district court shall extend the time for compliance a reasonable


period before ordering the facility closed.


SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-665 CN 1/19/2025 5:46:30 AM

























Req. No. 665 Page 41